Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-5305
Director of Natural Resources; powers and duties.

(1) The Director of Natural Resources shall, in consultation with the Carbon Sequestration Advisory Committee, assess agricultural lands in the State of Nebraska for past carbon sequestration and future carbon sequestration potential. The assessment shall seek to quantify carbon sequestration associated with various agricultural practices, management systems, and land uses occurring on agricultural lands in this state. On or before January 1, 2002, the director shall publish a report of the findings. The director may, from time to time, update such findings as advancements in understanding of the processes of carbon sequestration and new data become available.

(2) The assessment shall be conducted in a manner that shall provide a means for owners of agricultural land to estimate past and future net carbon sequestration resulting from agricultural practices, conservation measures, management systems, and land uses occurring on their property. The Director of Natural Resources may contract and cooperate with the Natural Resources Conservation Service of the United States Department of Agriculture to conduct assessment activities provided for in this section.

(3) The director may apply for and accept grants, gifts, or other sources of public and private funds to carry out the purposes of sections 2-5301 to 2-5306.

Laws 2000, LB 957, § 5.